Utah statutes.
11-41-103.   Prohibition on a county or municipality making a sales and use
tax incentive payment or entering into an agreement to make a sales and use
tax incentive payment.
A county or municipality may not:
(1)  make a sales and use tax incentive payment under an agreement entered
into on or after July 1, 2004; or
(2)  enter into an agreement on or after July 1, 2004 to make a sales and use
tax incentive payment.
